csv2yaml/yaml_output/VTI_Imp_oo.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup
     
Tests:

  Lemma - ALL :

     wanitoon+VTI+Imp+NA+Del+2Sg+0Sg/0Pl: wanitookan
     wanitoon+VTI+Imp+NA+Del+2Pl+0Sg/0Pl: wanitookeg
     wanitoon+VTI+Imp+NA+Del+Incl+0Sg/0Pl: wanitookang
     wanitoon+VTI+Imp+NA+Prb+2Sg+0Sg/0Pl: wanitooken
     wanitoon+VTI+Imp+NA+Prb+2Pl+0Sg/0Pl: wanitookegon
     wanitoon+VTI+Imp+NA+Prb+Incl+0Sg: wanitoosiidaa
     wanitoon+VTI+Imp+NA+Prb+Incl+0Pl: wanitoosiidaanin
     wanitoon+VTI+Imp+NA+Sim+2Sg+0Sg/0Pl: wanitoon
     wanitoon+VTI+Imp+NA+Sim+2Pl+0Sg/0Pl: [wanitoog,wanitook]
     wanitoon+VTI+Imp+NA+Sim+Incl+0Sg: wanitoodaa
     wanitoon+VTI+Imp+NA+Sim+Incl+0Pl: wanitoodaanin
